Arkansas, session 2025, HB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-15-2202(a)(1), concerning the
application for registration of a historic or special interest vehicle, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A person who is the owner of a historic or special interest
vehicle that is forty-five (45) thirty (30) years of age or older at the time
of making application for registration or transfer of title may, upon
application:
(A) Register the motor vehicle as a historic or special
interest vehicle, upon the payment of a fee of seven dollars ($7.00) for each
historic or special interest vehicle; and
(B) Be furnished a special license plate of distinctive
design to be displayed on each historic or special interest vehicle instead
*ZRC041*
02/17/2025 9:40:02 AM ZRC041

HB1502
of the standard Arkansas license plate.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-15-2202(d)(1), concerning the
application for registration of a historic or special interest vehicle, is
amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) A motor vehicle manufactured as a reproduction or facsimile of
a historic or special interest vehicle shall not be eligible for registration
under this section unless it has been in existence for forty-five (45) thirty
(30) years or more.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-15-2209(a), concerning alternative
license plates for antique motor vehicles, is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “antique license plate” means a license
plate that:
(1) Is approved for issuance under subsection (e) of this
section for a historic or special interest vehicle as defined in § 27-15-2201
that is more than forty-five (45) thirty (30) years of age instead of the
special license plate issued under § 27-15-2202; and
(2) Was issued by and approved for use in the State of Arkansas
in the same year as the model year of the vehicle that is being licensed.
















02/17/2025 9:40:02 AM ZRC041